Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-191
Odometers; repaired or replaced; notice.

If any odometer is repaired or replaced, the reading of the repaired or replaced odometer shall be set at the reading of the odometer repaired or replaced immediately prior to repair or replacement and the adjustment shall not be deemed a violation of section 60-190, except that when the repaired or replaced odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before such repair or replacement, the repaired or replaced odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice in writing on a form prescribed by the department shall be attached to the left door frame of the motor vehicle, or in the case of a motorcycle, to the frame of the motorcycle, by the owner or his or her agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced and any removal or alteration of such notice so affixed shall be deemed a violation of section 60-190.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 91.

Because no rational basis exists between the State's objective of preventing odometer fraud and the requirement that motorcycle dealers register vehicles under conditions which do not obligate dealers of other motor vehicles to do so, section 60-132 and this section offend the Equal Protection Clause of U.S. Const. amend. XIV. State v. Garber, 249 Neb. 648, 545 N.W.2d 75 (1996).